Washington statutes.
RCW 35.18.070

City manager—May serve two or more cities.

Whether the city manager shall devote his or her full time to the affairs of one city or town shall be determined by the council. A city manager may serve two or more cities or towns in that capacity at the same time.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2023; 1965 c 7 s 35.18.070. Prior: 1943 c 271 s 13; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9198-22.]